Utah statutes.
16-6a-1505.   Effect of filing an application for authority to conduct affairs.

(1)  Filing an application for authority to conduct affairs authorizes the foreign nonprofit corporation to conduct affairs in this state, subject to the right of the state to revoke the authority as provided in this part.

(2)  A foreign nonprofit corporation that has authority to conduct affairs in this state:

(a)  has the same rights and privileges as, but no greater rights or privileges than, a domestic nonprofit corporation of like character; and

(b)  except as otherwise provided by this chapter, is subject to the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities imposed on or later to be imposed on, a domestic nonprofit corporation of like character.

(3)  This chapter does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal affairs of a foreign nonprofit corporation authorized to conduct affairs in this state.

